Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.020

Method of election—Equal opportunity for protected class.

As provided in RCW 29A.92.030, no method of electing the governing body of a political subdivision may be imposed or applied in a manner that impairs the ability of members of a protected class or classes to have an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice as a result of the dilution or abridgment of the rights of voters who are members of a protected class or classes.

[ 2018 c 113 s 104.]